District of Columbia statutes.
4-1421

Definitions.

The term “appropriate authority” as used in this compact means, with reference to the District of Columbia, the Director of the Child and Family Services Agency for children who have been abused or neglected and the Director of the Department of Human Services for all other children.

Sept. 20, 1989, D.C. Law 8-30, § 3, 36 DCR 4744
Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-277, § 3(d), 48 DCR 2043

For applicability of D.C. Law 13-277, see note following § 4-1303.01a.

Complementary Legislation: Ala.—Code 1975, §§  44-2-20 to 44-2-26. Alaska—AS 47.70.010 to 47.70.080. Ariz.—A.R.S. §§ 8-548 to 8-548.06. Ark.—A.C.A. §§ 9-29-201 to 9-29-208. Cal.—West’s Ann. Cal.Fam.Code, §§ 7900 to 7912. Colo.—West’s C.R.S.A. §§ 24-60-1801 to 24-60-1803. Conn.—C.G.S.A. § 17a-175 to 17a-182. Del.—31 Del.C. § 381. D.C.—D.C. Official Code, 2001 Ed. §§ 4-1421 to 4-1424. Fla.—West’s F.S.A. §§ 409.401 to 409.405. Ga.— O.C.G.A. §§ 39-4-1 to 39-4-10. Hawaii—H R S §§ 350E-1 to 350E-9. Idaho—I.C. §§ 16-2101 to 16-2107. Ill.—S.H.A. 45 ILCS 15/0.01 to 15/9. Ind.—West’s A.I.C. 31-28-4-1 to 31-28-4-8. Iowa—I.C.A. §§ 232.158 to 232.168. Kan.—K.S.A. 38-1201 to 38-1206. Ky.—KRS 615.030 to 615.050, 615. 990. La.—LSA-Ch.C. arts. 1608 to 1622. Maine—22 M.R.S.A. §§ 4251 to 4269. Md.—Code, Family Law, §§ 5-601 to 5-611. Mass.—M.G.L.A. c. 119 App., §§ 2-1 to 2-8. Mich.—M.C.L.A. §§ 3.711 to 3.717. Miss.—Code 1972, §§ 43-18-1 to 43-18-17. Mo.—V.A.M.S. §§ 210.620 to 210.640. Mt.—M.C.A. 41-4-101 to 41-4-109. Nev.—N.R.S. 127.320 to 127.350. N.H.—RSA 170-A:1 to 170-A:6. N.J.—N.J.S.A. 9:23-5 to 9:23-17. N.M.—NMSA 1978, §§ 32A-11-1 to 32A-11-7. N.Y.—McKinney’s Social Services Law, § 374-a. N.C.—G.S. §§ 7B-3800 to 7B-3806. N.D.—NDCC 14-13-01 to 14-13-08. Ohio—R.C. §§ 5103.23 to 5103.237. Okl.—10 Okl.St.Ann. §§ 571 to 576. Ore.—ORS 417.200 to 417.260. Pa.—62 P.S. §§ 761 to 765. R.I.—Gen.Laws. 1956, §§ 40-15-1 to 40-15-10. S.C.—Code 1976, §§ 63-9-2200 to 63-9-2290. S.D.—SDCL 26-13-1 to 26-13-9. Tenn.—T.C.A. §§ 37-4-201 to 37-4-207. Tex.—V.T.C.A., Family Code §§ 162.101 to 162.107. Utah—U.C.A. 1953, 62A-4a-701 to 62A-4a-709. Vt.—33 V.S.A. §§ 5901 to 5910. Virgin Islands—34 V.I.C. §§ 121 to 127. Va.—Code 1950, §§ 63.2-1000, 63.2-1100 to 63.2-1105. Wash.—West’s RCWA 26.34.010 to 26.34.080. W.Va.—Code, 49-2A-1, 49-2A-2. Wis.—W.S.A. 48.988, 48.989. Wyo.—Wyo.Stat.Ann. §§ 14-5-101 to 14-5-108.

“The term ‘appropriate authority’ as used in this compact means, with reference to the District, the Director of the Department of Human Services.”
D.C. Law 13-277 rewrote the section which prior thereto read:
1981 Ed., § 32-1041.
This section is referenced in § 2-1515.08, § 4-1303.02a, and § 4-1303.03.